Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7454
Prescription drugs; restrictions on transfer; exceptions.

(1) No wholesale drug distributor, manufacturer, or pharmacy shall knowingly purchase or receive any prescription drug from any source other than a person or entity licensed under the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act except transfers for emergency medical reasons and except as provided in subsection (3) of section 71-2449, the gross dollar value of which shall not exceed five percent of the total prescription drug sales revenue of the transferor or transferee holder of a pharmacy license or practitioner as defined in section 38-2838 during the immediately preceding calendar year, and except as otherwise provided in the act.

(2) A wholesale drug distributor may receive returns or exchanges of prescription drugs from a pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, health care practitioner facility as defined in section 71-414, or hospital as defined in section 71-419 pursuant to the terms and conditions agreed upon between such wholesale drug distributor and such pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, health care practitioner facility, or hospital. Such returns and exchanges shall not be subject to sections 71-7455 to 71-7457. A wholesale drug distributor shall not receive from a pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, health care practitioner facility, or hospital an amount or quantity of a prescription drug greater than the amount or quantity that was originally sold by the wholesale drug distributor to such pharmacy, chain pharmacy warehouse, health care practitioner facility, or hospital.

(3) A manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor shall furnish prescription drugs only to persons licensed by the department and shall verify such licensure before furnishing prescription drugs to a person not known to the manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor.

(4) Prescription drugs furnished by a manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor shall be delivered only to the premises listed on the license, except that a manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor may furnish prescription drugs to a person licensed by the department or his or her agent at the premises of the manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor if:

(a) The identity and authorization of the recipient is properly established; and

(b) This method of receipt is employed only to meet the prescription drug needs of a particular patient of the person licensed by the department.

(5) Prescription drugs may be furnished to a hospital pharmacy receiving area. Receipt of such drugs shall be acknowledged by written receipt signed by a pharmacist or other authorized personnel. The receipt shall contain the time of delivery and the type and quantity of the prescription drug received. Any discrepancy between the signed receipt and the type and quantity of prescription drug actually received shall be reported by the receiving authorized pharmacy personnel to the delivering manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor by the next business day after the delivery to the pharmacy receiving area.

(6) A manufacturer or wholesale drug distributor shall only accept payment or allow the use of credit to establish an account for the purchase of prescription drugs from the owner or owners of record, the chief executive officer, or the chief financial officer listed on the license of a person or entity legally authorized to receive prescription drugs. Any account established for the purchase of prescription drugs shall bear the name of such licensee.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 16;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 158;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 83;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7416;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1295;

Laws 2008, LB308, § 13.